config/dictionaries/trademarks.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY esiaénrtolcdugmfphbyvkw-'.zqjxSNRTLCGDMFPHBEAUYOIVKWóöâôZQJXÅçèîêàïüäñ

ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '

WORDCHARS 0123456789'

# Define a flag 'P' for Plural
SFX P Y 2
SFX P   0   s    [^sxyz]
SFX P   0   es   [sxyz]

# Define a flag 'M' for Possessive
SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0   's   .
