config/dictionaries/trademarks.dic
132
tailscale/M
adrecon/M
mailpit/M
wazuh/M
cloudfront/M
noip/M
affero/M
anyconnect/M
anydesk/M
atera/M
fontawesome/M
ateranetworks/M
auscert/M
authentik/M
automator/M
azure/M
baidu/M
bestcrypt/M
bianlian/M
bigtable/M
bitlocker/M
blackfriday/M
blackhat/M
blauhaunt/M
bleve/M
bluemonday/M
bluesky/M
bomgar/M
cellebrite/M
charm/M
cloudflare/M
cloudflared/M
coveware/M
crewjam/M
crowdstrike/M
crowncloud/M
cybereason/M
cylance/M
cyware/M
elastic/M
elasticsearch/M
fibratus/M
filebeat/PM
fileserve/M
fortigate/M
fortinet/M
fortios/M
freebsd/M
github/M
go/M
graphana/M
greenshot/M
hasherezade/M
hollowshunter/M
humio/M
impacket/M
intezer/M
intune/M
iobit/M
jamf/M
kape/M
keycloak/M
lockbit/M
logscale/M
lunasec/M
malfind/M
malpedia/M
mandiant/M
mcafee/M
metasploit/M
metasploit/M
microsoft/M
mimecast/M
mitre/M
msonline/M
nextron/M
nginx/M
nirsoft/M
ntfswalker/M
nxlog/M
ollama/M
opensearch/M
pchunter/M
plaso/M
powerpoint/M
powersploit/M
powervault/M
proxifier/M
psychz/M
qlik/M
qradar/M
rclone/M
realtek/M
rekall/M
restic/M
revil/M
rubeus/M
rustdesk/M
ryuk/M
screenconnect/M
sharphound/M
sleuthkit/M
socfortress/M
sophos/M
spotify/M
sprig/M
starlark/M
sumitomo/M
supermicro/M
suricata/M
symantec/M
sysinternals/M
takajo/M
tanium/M
teamserver/M
teamviewer/M
telerik/M
timeshift/M
timesketch/M
unsplash/M
veeam/M
virustotal/M
visio/M
vmware/M
volatility/M
vrealize/M
vsphere/M
weblogic/M
winget/M
winlogbeat/PM
winpmem/M
yara/M
youtube/M
zdnet/M
zeek/M
zircolite/M
zitadel/M
zoho/M
